Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 22 Public Employee Hazardous Chemical Protection and Right to Know

Cross references.

Hazardous waste, T. 12, C. 8, Art. 3.

Reporting of hazardous occupations and cases of occupational disease to Department of Human Resources, §

34-9-290

.

Consent form of exposure to hazardous chemicals, §

34-10-3

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Public employee hazardous chemicals protection and right to know rules, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Labor, Safety Engineering, Chapter 300-3-19.

45-22-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Employee Hazardous Chemical Protection and Right to Know Act of 1988.”

History.

Code 1981, §

45-22-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1778, § 1.

45-22-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Appointing authority” means a person or group of persons authorized by law or delegated authority to make appointments to fill employee positions in the legislative, judicial, or executive branch of state government.

“Article” means a finished product or manufactured item:

Which is formed to a specific shape or design during manufacture;

Which has end use functions dependent in whole or in part upon its shape or design during end use; and

Which has either no change of chemical composition during end use or only those changes of composition which have no commercial purpose separate from that of the article.

“Chemical name” means the scientific designation of a chemical in accordance with the nomenclature system developed by the International Union of Pure and Applied Chemistry or the system developed by the Chemical Abstracts Service.

“Common name” means any designation or identification such as a code name, code number, trade name, or brand name used to identify a chemical other than by its chemical name.

“Contractor,” “independent contractor,” or “public contractor” means any person under a contract or agreement to provide labor or services to a public employer.

“Department” means the office of the Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Distributor” means an individual or employer, other than the manufacturer or importer, who supplies hazardous chemicals directly to users or to other distributors.

“Employee” or “public employee” means any person who is employed by any branch, department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency of the state and any inmate under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections performing a work assignment which requires the handling of any hazardous chemicals. Such term shall not include those employees of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources who are responsible for on-site response and assistance in the case of environmental emergencies while such employees are engaged in responding to such emergencies.

“Employer” or “public employer” means any branch, department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency of the state which employs or appoints an employee or employees. An independent contractor or subcontractor shall be deemed the sole employer of its employees, even when such employees are performing work at the workplace of another employer.

“Exposed” or “exposure” means that an employee is required by a public employer to be subjected to a hazardous chemical in the course of employment through any route of entry, including but not limited to, inhalation, ingestion, skin contact, or absorption and includes potential or accidental exposure.

“Hazardous chemical” means any chemical which is a physical hazard or a health hazard.

“Health hazard” means a chemical for which there is statistically significant evidence based on at least one study conducted in accordance with established scientific principles that acute or chronic health effects may occur in exposed employees and shall include all examples of hazardous chemicals to which reference is made in the definition of “health hazard” under the Occupational Safety and Health Administration standard, 29 C.F.R. Section 1910.1200 (1987).

“Importer” means the first individual or employer within the Customs Territory of the United States who receives hazardous chemicals produced in other countries for the purpose of supplying them to distributors or users within the United States.

“Manufacturer” means a person who produces, synthesizes, extracts, or otherwise makes hazardous chemicals.

“Material safety data sheet” means the document prepared by manufacturers in accordance with the requirements of the Occupational Safety and Health Administration standard, 29 C.F.R. Sections 1910.0000 through 1910.1500 (1987) and containing the following information:

The chemical name and the common name of the hazardous chemical;

The hazards or other risks in the use of the hazardous chemical, including:

The potential for fire, explosion, corrosivity, and reactivity;

The known acute and chronic health effects of risks from exposure, including the medical conditions which are generally recognized as being aggravated by exposure to the hazardous chemical; and

The primary routes of entry and the symptoms of overexposure;

The proper precautions, handling practices, necessary personal protective equipment, and other safety precautions in the use of or exposure to the hazardous chemicals, including appropriate emergency treatment in case of overexposure;

The emergency procedures for spills, fire, disposal, and first aid;

A description in lay terms of the known specific potential health risks posed by the hazardous chemical intended to alert any person reading this information; and

The year and month, if available, that the information was compiled and the name, address, and emergency telephone number of the manufacturer responsible for preparing the information.

“Mixture” means any combination of two or more chemicals, if the combination is not, in whole or in part, the result of a chemical reaction.

“Occupational Safety and Health Administration standard” means the Hazard Communication Standard issued by the Occupational Safety and Health Administration, 29 C.F.R. Sections 1910.0000 through 1910.1500 (1987).

“Person” means any individual, natural person, public or private corporation, incorporated association, government, government agency, partnership, or unincorporated association.

“Physical hazard” means a chemical for which there is scientifically valid evidence that it is a combustible liquid, a compressed gas, explosive, flammable, an organic peroxide, an oxidizer, pyrophoric, unstable (reactive), or water reactive.

“Produce” means to manufacture, process, formulate, or repackage.

“Work area” means a room inside a building or structure, an outside area, or other defined space in a workplace where hazardous chemicals are produced, stored, or used and where employees are present in the course of their employment.

“Workplace” means an establishment or business at one geographic location at which work is performed by a state employee and which contains one or more work areas. In the case of an independent contractor or subcontractor, the workplace shall be defined as all work areas wholly owned or controlled by such independent contractor or subcontractor.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-22-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1778, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1304, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 2015, p. 911, § 1/HB 278; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 45/HB 323.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, added present paragraph (1); redesignated former paragraphs (1) and (2) and present paragraphs (2) and (3), respectively; deleted former paragraph (3), which read: “ ‘Commissioner’ means the Commissioner of Labor or his designee.”; deleted “Department of Labor” preceding “office of the Safety Fire Commissioner” in paragraph (6); redesignated former paragraph (11.1) as present paragraph (12); redesignated former paragraph (12) as present paragraph (13); deleted former paragraph (13), which read: “ ‘Impurity’ means a hazardous chemical which is unintentionally present with another chemical or mixture.”; deleted former paragraph (14), which read: “Reserved.”; redesignated former paragraphs (15) and (16) as present paragraphs (14) and (15), respectively; deleted former paragraph (17), which read: “ ‘Medical emergency’ means a medical condition which poses an imminent threat to a person’s health, caused or suspected to have been caused by exposure to a hazardous chemical, and which requires immediate treatment by a physician.”; redesignated former paragraphs (18), (19), (20), (20.1), and (21) as present paragraphs (16), (17), (18), (19), and (20), respectively; deleted former paragraph (22), which read: “ ‘Specific chemical identity’ means the chemical name, the Chemical Abstracts Service Registry Number, or any other specific information which reveals the precise chemical designation.”; and redesignated former paragraphs (23) and (24) as present paragraphs (21) and (22), respectively.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “C.F.R.” for “CFR” throughout this Code section.

45-22-3.
Labeling requirements.

All hazardous chemicals introduced into the workplace by employers and used in the workplace by employees shall be in labeled containers that meet the requirements of the Occupational Safety and Health Administration standard; provided, however, that employers shall not be required to label portable containers into which hazardous chemicals are transferred from labeled containers provided that the portable container and the hazardous chemical transferred to it are intended only for the immediate use of an employee who performs the transfer or who is present at the time of such transfer.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-22-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1778, § 1.

45-22-4.
Responsibility of public contractors who introduce hazardous materials into workplace.

A public contractor who introduces hazardous materials into the workplace shall agree, and include a statement, in all bids, agreements, contracts, or other instrument to the effect that such contractor shall be responsible for compliance with the provisions of this chapter for persons employed by such contractor utilized under such contract. Any such public contractor who introduces hazardous chemicals into the workplace shall provide material safety data sheets for such chemicals to all employees using them and instruction in handling, emergency procedures, and disposal prior to introducing such hazardous chemicals. This Code section shall not be construed to place responsibility on any person, firm, or corporation other than public contractors.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-22-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1778, § 1.

45-22-5.
Exclusions from chapter; exclusions from labeling requirements.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:

Impurities which develop as intermediate materials during chemical processing but are not present in the final mixture and to which employee exposure is unlikely;

Alcoholic beverages as defined in Title 3;

Articles intended for personal consumption by employees in the workplace;

Any consumer product or hazardous substance as those terms are defined in the Consumer Product Safety Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 2051, et seq., and Federal Hazardous Substances Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1261, et seq., respectively, including any such product or hazardous chemicals manufactured by any state agency, where the employer can demonstrate it is used in the workplace in the same manner as normal consumer use and which use results in a duration and frequency of exposure which is not greater than exposures experienced by consumers;

Articles sold or used in retail food establishments and retail trade establishments;

Chemicals which are merely being transported in the state as part of a shipment in interstate or intrastate commerce; or

Chemicals or mixtures which may be hazardous but which are covered by the federal Atomic Energy Act and the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act.

The provisions of this chapter shall not require labeling of the following chemicals:

Any pesticide as such term is defined in the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. Section 136, et seq., when such pesticide is subject to the labeling requirements of that federal act and labeling regulations issued under that federal act by the United States Environmental Protection Agency;

Any food, food additive, color additive, drug, cosmetic, or medical or veterinary device, including materials intended for use as ingredients in such products, as such terms are defined in the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Section 301, et seq., and regulations issued under that federal act, when subject to the labeling requirements under that federal act by the Food and Drug Administration;

Any distilled spirits, beverage alcohols, wine, or malt beverage intended for nonindustrial use as such terms are defined in the federal Alcohol Administration Act, 27 U.S.C. Section 201, et seq., and regulations issued under that federal act, when subject to the labeling requirements of that federal act by the United States Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms; or

Any consumer product or hazardous substance as those terms are defined in the Consumer Product Safety Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 2051, et seq., and the federal Hazardous Substances Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1261, et seq., respectively, when subject to a consumer product safety standard or labeling requirement of those federal acts or regulations issued under those federal acts by the Consumer Product Safety Commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-22-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1778, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1304, § 6; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 45; Ga. L. 2015, p. 911, § 2/HB 278.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, deleted former subsection (c), which read: “The department shall be responsible for the dissemination of appropriate information available on the nature and hazards of hazardous chemicals.
The department shall promptly assist employers and employees with inquiries concerning the hazardous nature of such chemicals.”

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, “federal act” was substituted for “federal Act” throughout subsection (b).

45-22-6.
Rules and regulations; consultation.

The department shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to administer this chapter.

The department shall consult with persons knowledgeable in the field of hazardous chemicals to assist the department in carrying out its duties under this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-22-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1778, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 443, § 6; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1304, § 7; Ga. L. 2015, p. 911, § 3/HB 278.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “(a) The Governor’s Employment and Training Council shall assist the department in reviewing and preparing rules and regulations necessary to administer this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter, the council shall meet at the call of the Commissioner.
When the council is meeting for the purposes of this chapter, it shall make a report of each meeting, which shall include a record of its discussions and recommendations.
The department shall make such reports available to any interested person or group.

“(b) The Governor’s Employment and Training Council or the Commissioner shall be authorized to consult with persons knowledgeable in the field of hazardous chemicals and to create committees composed of such consultants and members of the council to assist the council and Commissioner in carrying out their duties under this chapter.

“(c) The department shall consider the advice and recommendations of the council in promulgating rules and regulations and their amendments.
If the department rejects the advice and recommendations of the council, the department must provide written reasons for such rejection.”

45-22-7.
Material safety data sheets; notice to employees; rights of employees.

The manufacturer, importer, or distributor of any hazardous chemical shall prepare a material safety data sheet which, to the best knowledge of the manufacturer, importer, or distributor, is current, accurate, and complete, based on information then reasonably available to the manufacturer, importer, or distributor, and provide a copy of the material safety data sheet to employers who purchase such hazardous chemicals and an electronic copy to the department annually.

Any person who produces a mixture may, for the purposes of this Code section, prepare and use a mixture material safety data sheet, subject to the provisions of subsection (j) of this Code section.

A manufacturer, importer, distributor, or employer may provide the information required by this Code section on an entire mixture, instead of on each hazardous chemical in it, when all of the following conditions exist:

Toxicity test information exists on the mixture itself or adequate information exists to form a valid judgment of the hazardous properties of the mixture itself and the material safety data sheet indicates that the information presented and the conclusions drawn are from some source other than direct test data on the mixture itself, and that a material safety data sheet on each constituent hazardous chemical identified on the material safety data sheet is available upon request;

Provision of information on the mixture will be as effective in protecting employee health as information on the ingredients;

The hazardous chemicals in the mixture are identified on the material safety data sheet unless it is unfeasible to describe all the ingredients in the mixture, provided that the reason why the hazardous chemicals in the mixture are not identified shall be stated on the material safety data sheet; and

A single mixture material safety data sheet may be provided for more than one formulation of a product mixture if the information provided does not vary for the formulation.

A manufacturer, importer, or distributor who is responsible for preparing and transmitting a material safety data sheet under the provisions of this Code section shall revise such material safety data sheet on a timely basis, as appropriate to the importance of any new information which would affect the contents of the existing material safety data sheet, and in any event within three months of such information becoming available to the manufacturer, importer, or distributor. Each such manufacturer, importer, or distributor shall provide a copy of the material safety data sheet to employers who have purchased such hazardous chemicals and an electronic copy to the department.

Any person subject to the provisions of this Code section shall be relieved of the obligation to provide a direct purchaser of a hazardous chemical with a material safety data sheet if:

He or she has a record of having provided the direct purchaser with the most recent version of the material safety data sheet;

The chemical is labeled pursuant to:

The federal Atomic Energy Act; or

The federal Resource Conservation Recovery Act; or

The article is one sold at retail and is incidentally sold to an employer or the employer’s employees in the same form, approximate amount, concentration, and manner as it is sold to consumers, and, to the seller’s knowledge, employee exposure to the article is not significantly greater than the consumer exposure occurring during the principal consumer use of the article.

If an employer is not supplied with a material safety data sheet by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor for a hazardous chemical subject to this Code section, such employer shall, within a reasonable amount of time after discovering that a material safety data sheet has not been supplied, use diligent efforts to obtain such material safety data sheet from the manufacturer, importer, or distributor. For purposes of this subsection, “diligent efforts” means a prompt inquiry by the employer to the manufacturer, importer, or distributor of the hazardous chemicals; provided, however, that an independent contractor or subcontractor shall be responsible for obtaining the material safety data sheet for his or her employees in the workplace of another.

If after having used diligent efforts, an employer still fails to obtain a material safety data sheet, such employer shall notify the department of the employer’s inability to obtain such material safety data sheet.

An employer who has used diligent efforts and who has made a documented notification to the department pursuant to this Code section shall not be found in violation of this Code section with respect to the material safety data sheet which was not supplied by the manufacturer, importer, or distributor as required by this Code section.

Every employer who manufactures, produces, uses, applies, or stores hazardous chemicals in the workplace shall post a notice as prescribed by rule or regulation promulgated by the department in a place where notices are normally posted, informing employees of their rights under this chapter.

Every employer who manufactures, produces, uses, applies, or stores hazardous chemicals in the workplace shall maintain a material safety data sheet for each hazardous chemical which is present in such workplace. All material safety data sheets shall be readily available in the workplace; provided, however, that employers who maintain one or more work areas which are not fixed at specific geographic locations shall be authorized to maintain material safety data sheets for each hazardous chemical used in such work area at a central location.

A material safety data sheet may be kept in any form, including operations procedures, and may be designed to cover groups of hazardous chemicals in a work area where it may be appropriate to address the hazards of a process rather than individual hazardous chemicals. The employer shall ensure that in all cases the required information is provided for each hazardous chemical, and is readily accessible during each workshift to employees when they are in their work area; provided, however, that employers who maintain one or more work areas which are not fixed at specific geographic locations shall be authorized to maintain material safety data sheets for each hazardous chemical used in such work area at a central location.

Any employee may request in writing and shall have the right to examine and obtain the material safety data sheets for the hazardous chemicals to which he or she is, has been, or may be exposed. The employer shall provide any material safety data sheet within its possession within five of the requesting employee’s working days, subject to the provisions of subsection (g) of this Code section. The employer may adopt reasonable procedures for acting upon such requests to avoid interruption of normal work operations.

An independent contractor or subcontractor working in the workplace of another employer may request in writing and shall have the right to examine the material safety data sheets for the hazardous chemicals to which such contractor, subcontractor, or employees thereof are, have been, or may be exposed. The employer shall provide any material safety data sheet within its possession within five of the requesting independent contractor’s or subcontractor’s working days, subject to the provisions of subsection (g) of this Code section. The employer may adopt reasonable procedures for acting upon such requests to avoid interruption of normal work operations.

If an employee who has requested a material safety data sheet pursuant to this chapter has not received such material safety data sheet within five of the requesting employee’s working days, subject to the provisions of subsection (g) of this Code section, that employee may refuse to work with the chemical for which he or she has requested the material safety data sheet until such material safety data sheet is provided by the employer; provided, however, that nothing contained in this paragraph shall be construed to permit any employee to refuse to perform essential services, as such term is defined by rule or regulation; provided, further, that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to interfere with the right of the employer to transfer an employee who so refuses to work to other duties until such material safety data sheet is provided, such a transfer not to be considered as a discriminatory act under Code Section 45-22-10. No pay, position, seniority, or other benefits shall be lost for exercise of any right provided by this chapter as a result of such a transfer.

No employer shall discharge or otherwise discriminate against an employee for the employee’s assertion of the employee’s rights under this chapter.

For the purposes of this Code section, an employer, independent contractor, or subcontractor shall maintain material safety data sheets for their own workplaces only; provided, however, that employees of such independent contractor or subcontractor, insofar as they are exposed in the course of their employment to hazardous chemicals in other workplaces, shall have the right to examine material safety data sheets for those chemicals to which they are exposed from the workplace employer through a written request to their own employer as provided in paragraph (2) of subsection (k) of this Code section. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to require an employer to conduct studies to develop new information.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-22-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1778, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1304, §§ 8, 9; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 45; Ga. L. 2015, p. 911, § 4/HB 278; Ga. L. 2016, p. 846, § 45/HB 737.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, in subsection (a), deleted “and provide the direct purchasers of such hazardous chemicals and, upon request, the department, with” following “shall prepare” near the beginning, and added “, and provide a copy of the material safety data sheet to employers who purchase such hazardous chemicals and an electronic copy to the department annually” at the end; added the last sentence in subsection (d); in subsection (e), substituted “he or she” for “If he” at the beginning of paragraph (1), and substituted “The” for “If the” at the beginning of paragraphs (2) and (3); in subsection (g), substituted “such employer shall notify the department of the employer’s inability to obtain such material safety data sheet” for “he shall request the department to obtain such material safety data sheet on his behalf”; substituted “notification” for “request” in subsection (h); inserted “or regulation” following “rule” in subsection (i); inserted “, as such term is defined by rule or regulation” in paragraph (k)(4); and deleted the former next-to-last sentence in subsection (m), which read: “Employers must advise employees that they can obtain further information from the department.”

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “means” for “shall mean” near the beginning of the second sentence of subsection (f) and made gender neutral changes throughout this Code section.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “an” was substituted for “a” following “discriminate against” in subsection (l).

45-22-8.
Information and training standards.

Each employer shall be required to comply with the minimum information standards set forth in this subsection. Each employee shall be informed of:

The requirements of this Code section;

What a material safety data sheet is and the contents of the material safety data sheet for any hazardous chemical to which he is exposed, or equivalent information, either in written form or through training programs;

Any operations in his work area where hazardous chemicals are present;

The location and availability of training programs;

His right to receive information regarding hazardous chemicals to which he may be exposed;

His right for his physician to receive information regarding hazardous chemicals to which the employee may be exposed; and

His right against discharge or other discrimination due to the employee’s exercise of the rights provided by this chapter.

In addition to providing the information required by subsection (a) of this Code section, each employer shall be required to provide a training program for all employees who are exposed to hazardous chemicals in the normal course of their employment. When training employees who are exposed to hazardous chemicals, the employer shall explain any physical or health hazards associated with the use of the chemical or mixture; proper precautions for handling, necessary personal protective equipment or other safety precautions necessary to prevent or minimize exposure to the hazardous chemical; methods of observation that may be used to detect the presence or release of a hazardous chemical in a work area, including, but not limited to, spot check monitoring, continuous monitoring, or methods of visual or olfactory detection; the labeling system and the material safety data sheet, and how employees can obtain and use the appropriate hazard information; and emergency procedures for spills, fire, disposal, and first aid. This information may relate to an entire class of hazardous chemicals to the extent appropriate and related to the job. Whenever any employer receives a new or revised material safety data sheet, such information shall be provided to employees on a timely basis not to exceed 30 days after receipt, if the new information indicates significantly increased risks to or measures necessary to protect employee health as compared to those stated on a material safety data sheet previously provided.

The department shall by rule or regulation establish minimum information and training standards for compliance with this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-22-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1778, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 443, § 7; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1304, § 10; Ga. L. 2015, p. 911, § 5/HB 278.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, in subsection (c), substituted “rule or regulation” for “rule and regulation” in the first sentence, and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The Governor’s Employment and Training Council shall be authorized to make recommendations to the department regarding the development and implementation of such standards.”

45-22-9.
Publication by employers of list of hazardous chemicals in workplace.

On and after July 1, 1989, each employer shall publish in print or electronically in January and July of each year a list of hazardous chemicals that its employees use or are exposed to in the workplace. Such list shall be available for public inspection at the workplace office.
A comprehensive list of all hazardous chemicals used by the employer shall also be available for public inspection at the employer’s state headquarters.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-22-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1778, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1304, § 11; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

45-22-10.
Unlawful discharge, disciplining, or discrimination against employees.

No person shall discharge or cause to be discharged or otherwise discipline or in any manner discriminate against any employee for any of the following reasons:

The employee has requested information regarding hazardous chemicals, filed any complaint or action, or has instituted, or caused to be instituted, any proceeding under this chapter;

The employee has testified or is about to testify in any proceeding in his own behalf or on behalf of others; or

The employee has exercised any other right afforded pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

No pay, position, seniority, or other benefits shall be lost for exercise of any right provided by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-22-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1778, § 1.

45-22-11.
Filing of employee grievances; termination of contract by employer for violation of Code Section 45-22-4; ability of employers to dismiss or discipline employees; judicial review of grievances.

In order to enforce the provisions of this chapter, any employee adversely affected by a violation of this chapter by that employee’s employer may file a grievance in accordance with the employer’s established grievance procedures. Appointing authorities shall pursue all complaints concerning occupational exposure to hazardous chemicals.

Upon any violation of Code Section 45-22-4 by a contractor, the employer under agreement with such contractor shall have the right to terminate the contract without liability.

Nothing in this chapter shall change or modify the right or ability of employers to dismiss or discipline employees in accordance with the laws of this state.

Any employee dissatisfied with a final decision of an appointing authority with regard to a grievance filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be entitled to judicial review in the same manner as provided for judicial review of contested cases in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

45-22-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1778, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1304, § 12; Ga. L. 2015, p. 911, § 6/HB 278.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, in subsection (a), deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Employees dissatisfied with a final decision of an appointing authority may file a grievance with the Commissioner.”; and, in subsection (d), substituted “dissatisfied with a final decision of an appointing authority with regard” for “adversely affected by a final decision of the Commissioner”.

45-22-12.
Sovereign immunity.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to constitute a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the state or any branch, department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency of the state. A violation of the provisions of this chapter shall not be the basis for an action for damages against the state or any branch, department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency of the state or any member, officer, or employee of the state or any branch, department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency of this state and said entities and persons are granted immunity from civil actions for damages for any violation of the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-22-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1778, § 1.

Law reviews.

For comment, “Keeping the Arms in Touch:
Taking Political Accountability Seriously in the Eleventh Amendment Arm of the State Doctrine,” see 64 Emory L.J. 819 (2015).